Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 2. City Manager

Article does not violate state constitutional provision

(art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.), providing that no local or special law shall be passed for “incorporation of cities, towns or villages; or changing or amending the charters of any cities, towns or villages.” State ex rel. Keefe v. McInerney, 63 Wyo. 280, 182 P.2d 28,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1947).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 181 to 185.

§ 15-4-201.
Council officers; election; duties; compensation.

The council, at the first meeting after the first election under this article and at the first meeting after each regular election thereafter, shall elect from their number a president of the council to be the mayor and a vice president of the council. During the absence or disability of the mayor, the vice president shall perform the duties of the mayor. In the absence or disability of both, the council shall choose from their number a president pro tem to perform the duties of the mayor.

The salary for each councilman, other than the mayor, shall be not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00), as the council establishes by ordinance, for actual attendance at each regular or special meeting. The salary for the mayor shall not be more than twice the salary of the other council members.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 219, 220; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-219, 15.1-220; W.S. 1977, §§

15-4-201

,

15-4-202

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 33, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 8, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, and for duty of said officers to pay all fees collected into the proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

Veto power of mayor. —

See case note to §

15-3-201

.

Cited

in

Haddenham v. City of Laramie, 648 P.2d 551,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 15-4-202.
Employees; manager; employment, salary, vacancy; attorney; other positions; salaries, duties; municipal judges; experts; exception.

The governing body, as soon as possible after the first election, shall employ a city manager and a city attorney and fix their salaries. The city manager shall receive no other or additional salary for the performance of any of the duties required of him as city manager. The city manager is an employee and serves at the pleasure of the governing body. His salary may be changed from year to year, and his employment may be terminated at any time by a majority vote of the governing body.

The manager shall give thirty (30) days notice in writing to the governing body before resigning from his position. If the position is vacant for any reason, the governing body shall immediately proceed to employ another person. If there is a delay in securing a new manager, the governing body shall immediately appoint an acting manager to fill the vacancy on an interim basis. He shall qualify the same as the manager and shall be vested with authority and charged with the duties and responsibilities of the manager until a manager is employed and qualified.

The governing body may fix the salaries for the various offices in the city to be paid in twelve (12) or more installments per year.

through (xi) Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 8, § 2.

The governing body shall appoint one (1) or more municipal judges with jurisdiction to hear and determine all cases arising under the ordinances of the city or town. The rules of practice before the municipal judges shall conform as nearly as possible to the provisions of the justice code concerning complaints, continuances and trial, but no change of venue may be granted in any case.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the manager may require any appointive officers and any employees to perform duties and services in one (1) or more departments of the city or town. No person shall receive compensation in addition to the salary of his position for the performance of any required duties. The city attorney is not required to perform any service other than legal service. In cities and towns having a population of more than ten thousand (10,000), policemen and firemen are not required to perform any service other than that normally considered to be within their departments. Salaries of the members of the police and fire departments shall be established in conformity with the civil service laws of the state and ordinances of the city applicable to those departments.

The governing body may employ experts to perform unusual or special service upon the recommendation of the manager or otherwise. Subject to equal qualifications, preference shall be given to bona fide residents of the city or town in employing applicants for positions.

Except for the city manager, attorney and municipal judges, all employees shall be employed by the city manager, be selected on merit and serve at his pleasure. He shall fix their salaries by and with the consent of the governing body. Nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting or superseding the provisions of chapter 5 of this title.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 226; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-226; Laws 1971, ch. 46, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

15-4-220

; Laws 1978, ch. 17, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1985, ch. 8, § 2; ch. 209, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to salaries of policemen and firemen generally, see § 15-5-106(a).

For authority of board of public utilities in cities and towns to make all appointments and hire all agents, servants and employees of the water and sanitary sewer departments of the city, and fix their compensation, etc., see §

15-7-406

.

For constitutional provisions that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, and for duty of such officers to pay all fees collected into the proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (e), in the second to last sentence, deleted “according to the last federal census” preceding “policemen and firemen.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

City manager must be an elector when appointed.

State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1923).

Section makes no provision for severance pay or pay in lieu of vacation.

Kurz v. City of Sheridan, 489 P.2d 621,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited in

Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017).

Applied

in

Casper v. International Ass'n of Firefighters, Local 904, 713 P.2d 1187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 15-4-203.
Manager; duties; generally.

In addition to his specific duties, the manager shall:

See that all laws and ordinances are observed and enforced;

Attend all meetings of the governing body and may recommend necessary and expedient measures;

Prepare and submit to the governing body reports required by it, or that he considers advisable;

Keep the governing body fully advised of the city’s financial condition and its future needs;

Serve as the city’s purchasing agent;

Perform all duties imposed upon him; and

Recommend rules and regulations necessary for the efficient and economical conduct of the business of the city or town subject to the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 227, 231; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-227, 15.1-231; W.S. 1977, §§

15-4-221

,

15-4-225

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision that all disbursements shall be made by warrants signed by the manager and countersigned by the mayor, see §

15-4-302

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 15-4-204.
Manager; duties; public health; garbage.

The manager shall enforce all statutes, ordinances and regulations relative to the public health, comfort and safety. If the owner or occupant of property deposits or allows the accumulation of garbage, offal, manure or rubbish of any kind upon it, or in the streets or alleys upon which it abuts, or permits weeds to grow and remain on the property, in violation of any statute or ordinance, the manager shall serve notice upon the occupant, or the owner or his agent, to remove the rubbish or weeds. If they are not removed within one (1) day after service of notice, the manager shall have them removed. The cost of removal shall be assessed against the property and constitutes a lien thereon. The owner shall be notified of the amount assessed, and if it is not paid, it shall be collected in the same manner as other special assessments.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 228; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-228; W.S. 1977, § 15-4-222; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to power of governing body to regulate concerning health, etc., see § 15-1-103(a)(xviii).

As to the Wyoming Weed and Pest Control Act of 1973, see §

11-5-101

et seq.

As to public health and safety generally, see title 35.

Territorial scope of ordinance's effect for health purposes.—

For health purposes, a city may make an ordinance effective for a distance of five miles beyond the city limits. Haddenham v. Laramie, 648 P.2d 551,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 15-4-205.
Management and control of municipal public utility.

Unless a board of public utilities has been established as provided in chapter 7, article 4, the manager shall control and manage any public utility owned and operated by the city or town. Subject to the laws relating to public utilities, he shall implement all rates and compensation as the governing body establishes to be paid by consumers of water, gas, electric current or any service furnished by any other public utility, owned or operated by the city or town, provided they are equal and uniform to all persons within the class served. He shall make and enforce all necessary rules, regulations and penalties to enforce their collection, or for the protection of the property and rights pertaining to public utilities. At the end of each month, or within three (3) days thereafter, he shall file with the clerk a report showing the receipts and disbursements in the management of all public utilities during the month.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 229; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-229; W.S. 1977, § 15-4-223; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 33, § 1.

§ 15-4-206.
Management and control of municipal public utility; powers and duties as to employees; exception.

The manager shall control and manage the fire department and the police department and may appoint a chief of the fire department, a chief of the police department and any other employees necessary in those departments.

The manager shall appoint a city clerk. He may also appoint a city engineer and a city treasurer. The city clerk may be appointed to act as treasurer, but he shall not receive more than the salary of one (1) position. The manager may appoint and remove any other necessary employees and fix their compensation within the limits specified by the governing body and the law. Except as otherwise provided by law, he shall prescribe the powers and duties of all employees and may require any employee to perform duties in two (2) or more departments. He shall file with the clerk a list of the names of all employees together with a statement of the salary or compensation each is to receive.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 230, 232; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-230, 15.1-232; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-4-224,

15-4-226

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to appointment of clerk and treasurer in incorporated towns, see §

15-2-102

.

As to appointment of clerk and treasurer in cities of the first class, see §

15-3-204

.

As to election of police chief, fire chief, clerk and treasurer in cities operating under the commission form of government, see §

15-4-104

.

As to state treasurer, see §

9-1-409

.

As to county treasurer, see §§

18-3-801

to

18-3-814

.

Stated

in

City Council v. Kreiling, 911 P.2d 1037,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-4-207.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to employee bonds, see §

15-1-124

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 233, related to bonds of employees.

§ 15-4-208.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 209, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to prohibitions for city or town governing-body members, or their immediate family, see §

15-1-127

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 235, related to prohibition against city or town officers and employees soliciting or receiving pay other than their lawful salary.

§ 15-4-209.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-1-128

by Laws 1985, ch. 209, § 2.

§ 15-4-210.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-301

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-211.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 209, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 237, related to inventory and statement of public property held by city and town officers and employees.

§ 15-4-212.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 3; 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to fiscal year, see §

15-2-201

.

As to fiscal year finances, see §§

16-4-103

through

16-4-124

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 238, related to financial systems and fiscal years.

§ 15-4-213.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-302

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§§ 15-4-214 through 15-4-219.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 240 through 245, related to warrants, payment of bonds, funds, and sinking funds.

§ 15-4-220.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-303

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§§ 15-4-221 through 15-4-224.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 247 through 250, related to limitations on obligations, certificates of indebtedness, tax accounts, and expenditure estimates.

§ 15-4-225.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-1-126

by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 3.

§§ 15-4-226 through 15-4-228.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 152, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to deposits by political subdivisions, approval of depositories, and rate of interest, see §

9-4-818

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 252 through 254, related to depositories, statements of interest, and general tax limitations.

§ 15-4-229.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-304

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§§ 15-4-230 through 15-4-235.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 33, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 257 through 262, related to city and town contracts. For present similar provisions, see §

15-1-113

.

§ 15-4-236.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 263, related malfeasant acts in aiding contract bids. For present provisions, see §

6-5-105

.

§§ 15-4-237 through 15-4-240.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 33, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 263 through 267, related to charge, hearing and penalty for malfeasance under former §

15-4-236

, collusive bidding, and voiding of contracts violating this article. For present similar provisions, see §

15-1-113

.

§ 15-4-241.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1980, ch. 49, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 269, related to controlling and changing streets and alleys.

§ 15-4-242.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-305

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-243.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 33, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 271, related to contracts for the cleaning of streets.

§ 15-4-244.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-306

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-245.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-307

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-246.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-308

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-247.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-309

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-248.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-310

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-249.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-311

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-250.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-312

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 15-4-251.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

15-4-313

by Laws 2007, ch. 124, § 1.